apertium-sv-da/dev/comb.da.dix
    <pardef n="Schweiz__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Eva__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Trond__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Interjections -->

    <pardef n="ak__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="jeg__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jeg</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mig__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mig</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="du__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>du</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dig__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dig</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="han__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>han</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ham__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ham</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hun__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hun</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hende__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hende</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="den__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="det__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>det</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>det</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vi__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vi</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="os__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="I__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>I</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jer__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jer</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="de__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dem__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dem</l>
          <r>prnpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sig__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- TODO: Check these two paradigms 
    <pardef n="den/__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="ut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="det/__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="ut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 
    -->
    
    <pardef n="hver__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="al/__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    
    <pardef n="nog/en__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="and/en__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="disse__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
   </pardef>
    
     <pardef n="d/enne__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enne</l>
          <r>enne<s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ette</l>
          <r>enne<s n="prn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="begge__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="in/gen__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gen</l>
          <r>gen<s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tet</l>
          <r>gen<s n="prn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gen</l>
          <r>gen<s n="prn"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>genting</l>
          <r>gen<s n="prn"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="der__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Nouns -->

    <e lm="ak"><i>ak</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="bom"><i>bom</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="farvel"><i>farvel</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="fy"><i>fy</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="godaften"><i>godaften</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="guuud"><i>guuud</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hej"><i>hej</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hmm"><i>hmm</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ih"><i>ih</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ja"><i>ja</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="javel"><i>javel</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="jo"><i>jo</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="la"><i>la</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="mmm"><i>mmm</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nej"><i>nej</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nå"><i>nå</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nåja"><i>nåja</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="næh"><i>næh</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="oh"><i>oh</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ok"><i>ok</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="pyt"><i>pyt</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="tillykke"><i>tillykke</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ushh"><i>ushh</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="værsgo"><i>værsgo</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="åh"><i>åh</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="øv"><i>øv</i><par n="ak__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="jeg"><i/><par n="jeg__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="mig"><i/><par n="mig__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="du"><i/><par n="du__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dig"><i/><par n="dig__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="han"><i/><par n="han__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ham"><i/><par n="ham__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="hun"><i/><par n="hun__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="hende"><i/><par n="hende__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="den"><i/><par n="den__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="det"><i/><par n="det__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vi"><i/><par n="vi__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="os"><i/><par n="os__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="I"><i/><par n="I__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="jer"><i/><par n="jer__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="de"><i/><par n="de__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dem"><i/><par n="dem__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="der"><i>der</i><par n="der__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="som"><i>som</i><par n="der__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="al"><i>al</i><par n="al/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="alle"><i>alle</i><par n="al/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="alt"><i>alt</i><par n="al/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="allesammen"><i>allesammen</i><par n="al/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="altsammen"><i>altsammen</i><par n="al/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="alting"><i>alting</i><par n="al/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="anden"><i>and</i><par n="and/en__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="hver"><i>hver</i><par n="hver__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="enhver"><i>enhver</i><par n="hver__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nogen"><i>nog</i><par n="nog/en__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="disse"><i>disse</i><par n="disse__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="denne"><i>d</i><par n="d/enne__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="begge"><i>begge</i><par n="begge__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="hinanden"><i>hinanden</i><par n="begge__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ingen"><i>in</i><par n="in/gen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="Schweiz"><i>Schweiz</i><par n="Schweiz__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Trond"><i>Trond</i><par n="Trond__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Kålle"><i>Kålle</i><par n="Trond__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Eva"><i>Eva</i><par n="Eva__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ada"><i>Ada</i><par n="Eva__np"/></e>
